Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202049-14,124.02
Commission;
possible criminal violation; referral to Attorney General; duties of Attorney
General.

At any time after the commencement of
a preliminary investigation, the commission may refer the matter of a possible
criminal violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act to the Attorney General for consideration of criminal prosecution.
The fact of the referral shall not be subject to the confidentiality provisions
of section 49-14,124.01. The Attorney General shall determine if a matter
referred by the commission will be criminally prosecuted. If the Attorney
General determines that a matter will be criminally prosecuted, he or she
shall advise the commission in writing of the determination. If the Attorney
General determines that a matter will not be criminally prosecuted, he or
she shall advise the commission in writing of the determination. The fact
of the declination to criminally prosecute shall not be subject to the confidentiality
provisions of section 49-14,124.01.

Laws 2007, LB464, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 30.